Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.88.190

Enforcement of rules restricting contact.

Any general authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020 in this state may enforce this chapter as it relates to orders restricting the defendants' ability to have contact with the victim or others.

[ 2017 c 230 s 6.]